Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB12.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Account holder" means a resident of Kentucky who:
(a) Opens an account or creates a profile on a social media platform; or
(b) Is identified by a social media platform by a unique identifier while using or
accessing the social media platform when the social media platform knows
or has reason to believe that the individual is located in Kentucky;
(2) "Daily active users" means the number of unique users in the United States who
used a social media platform on at least eighty percent (80%) of the days during
the previous twelve (12) months, or during the previous thirty (30) days if the
social media platform did not exist for twelve (12) months;
(3) "Infinite scrolling" means:
(a) Content that loads as a user scrolls down the page without the need to open
a separate page; or
(b) The use of pages with no visible or apparent end or page breaks;
(4) "Resident" means a person who lives in Kentucky for more than six (6) months
of the year; and
(5) "Social media platform":
(a) Means any online forum, website, or application that:
1. Allows users to upload content or view the content or activity of other
users;
2. Ten percent (10%) or more of the daily active users of which are
younger than sixteen (16) years old who spend on average two (2)
hours per day or longer on the online forum, website, or application
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
on the days when using the online forum, website or application
during:
a. The previous twelve (12) months; or
b. The previous thirty (30) days if the online forum, website, or
application did not exist for twelve (12) months;
3. Employs algorithms that analyze user data or information on users to
select content for users; and
4. Has any of the following addictive features:
a. Infinite scrolling;
b. Push notifications or alerts sent by the online forum, website, or
application to inform the user about specific activities or events
related to the user's account;
c. Displays personal interactive metrics that indicate the number of
times other users have clicked a button to indicate their reaction
to content or have shared or reposted the content;
d. Video that begins to play without the user first clicking on the
video or on a play button for the video; or
e. Livestreaming or a function that allows a user or advertiser to
broadcast live video content in real-time; and
(b) Does not include an online service, website, or application where the
exclusive function is email or direct messaging consisting of text,
photographs, pictures, images, or videos shared only between the sender
and the recipients without displaying or posting publicly or to other users
not specifically identified as the recipients by the sender.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A social media platform shall:
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
(1) Prohibit a minor who is younger than fourteen (14) years old from entering into
a contract with the social media platform to become an account holder;
(2) Terminate any account held by an account holder who is younger than fourteen
(14) years old, including accounts that the social media platform treats or
categorizes as belonging to an account holder who is likely younger than
fourteen (14) years old for purposes of targeting content or advertising. In
terminating accounts under this subsection, the social media platform shall:
(a) Provide ninety (90) days for an account holder to dispute the termination;
and
(b) Terminate the account upon the expiration of the ninety (90) day period if
the account holder fails to effectively dispute the termination;
(3) Allow any account holder who is younger than fourteen (14) years old to request
to terminate his or her account. In terminating accounts under this subsection,
the social medial platform shall terminate the account within five (5) business
days after the request;
(4) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder who is younger
than fourteen (14) years old to request that the minor's account be terminated. In
terminating accounts under this subsection, the social media platform shall
terminate the account within (10) business days after the request; and
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, permanently delete all personal information
held by the social media platform relating to an account that is terminated under
this section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A social media platform shall:
(1) Prohibit a minor who is fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old from entering into
a contract with the social media platform to become an account holder, unless the
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
minor's parent or guardian provides consent for the minor to become an account
holder;
(2) Terminate any account held by an account holder who is fourteen (14) or fifteen
(15) years old, including accounts that the social media platform treats or
categorizes as belonging to an account holder who is likely fourteen (14) or
fifteen (15) years old for purposes of targeting content or advertising, unless the
account holder's parent or guardian has provided consent for the minor to create
or maintain the account. In terminating accounts under this subsection, the
social media platform shall:
(a) Provide ninety (90) days for an account holder to dispute the termination;
and
(b) Terminate the account upon the expiration of the ninety (90) day period if
the account holder fails to effectively dispute the termination;
(3) Allow any account holder who is fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old to request
to terminate his or her account. In terminating accounts under this subsection,
the social medial platform shall terminate the account within five (5) business
days after the request;
(4) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder who is fourteen
(14) or fifteen (15) years old to request that the minor's account be terminated. In
terminating accounts under this subsection, the social media platform shall
terminate the account within (10) business days after the request; and
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, permanently delete all personal information
held by the social media platform relating to an account that is terminated under
this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a court enjoins the enforcement of Section 3 of this Act, or any other
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
provisions of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act due to Section 3 of this Act, Section 3 of
this Act shall be severed and subsection (2) of this section shall apply:
(2) A social media platform shall:
(a) Prohibit a minor who is fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old from entering
into a contract with the social media platform to become an account holder;
(b) Terminate any account held by an account holder who is fourteen (14) or
fifteen (15) years old, including accounts that the social media platform
treats or categorizes as belonging to an account holder who is likely
fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old for purposes of targeting content or
advertising. In terminating accounts under this subsection, the social media
platform shall:
1. Provide ninety (90) days for an account holder to dispute the
termination; and
2. Terminate the account upon the expiration of the ninety (90) day
period if the account holder fails to effectively dispute the termination;
(c) Allow any account holder who is fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old to
request to terminate his or her account. In terminating accounts under this
subsection, the social medial platform shall terminate the account within
five (5) business days after the request;
(d) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder who is
fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old to request that the minor's account be
terminated. In terminating accounts under this subsection, the social media
platform shall terminate the account within (10) business days after the
request; and
(e) Unless otherwise required by law, permanently delete all personal
information held by the social media platform relating to an account that is
terminated under this section.
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall be deemed an unfair, false,
misleading or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in
violation of KRS 367.170.
(2) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General or any
other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS
367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS 367.170, shall
apply with equal force and effect to a violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the remedies, powers,
duties, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the Commonwealth, or any
other person under any other statutory or common law.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any minor injured by a violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall have a civil
cause of action in Circuit Court to:
(a) Enjoin further violations;
(b) Recover actual damages sustained up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000);
and
(c) Recover the costs of the action including reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) A civil action filed under this section shall be brought within one (1) year from
the date the complainant knew or reasonably should have known of the alleged
violation.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 7 to 13 of this Act:
(1) "Age category" means a category of an individual based on age, including child,
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
younger teenager, older teenager, and adult. As used in this subsection:
(a) "Child" means an individual who is younger than thirteen (13) years old;
(b) "Younger teenager" means an individual who is thirteen (13) to fifteen (15)
years old;
(c) "Older teenager" means an individual who is sixteen (16) to eighteen (18)
years old; and
(d) "Adult" means an individual who is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) "Age category data" means information about a user's age category that is
collected by an app store provider and shared with a developer;
(3) "Age rating" means a classification that provides an assessment of the suitability
of an app's content for different age groups;
(4) "App" means a software application or electronic service that a user may
operate, run, or direct on a mobile device;
(5) "App store" means a publicly available website, software application, or
electronic service that distributes apps from third-party developers to users;
(6) "App store provider" means a person that owns, operates, or controls an app
store;
(7) "Content description" means a description of the specific content elements that
informed the age rating of an app;
(8) "Developer" means a person that owns or controls an app made available
through an app store;
(9) "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years old;
(10) "Minor account" means an account with an app store provider that:
(a) Is established by an individual who the app store provider has determined is
a minor through the app store provider's age verification methods; and
(b) Requires affiliation with a parent account;
(11) "Mobile device" means a portable computing device that:
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
(a) Provides cellular or wireless connectivity;
(b) Is capable of connecting to the internet;
(c) Runs a mobile operating system; and
(d) Is capable of operating or running apps through the mobile operating
system;
(12) "Mobile operating system" means software that:
(a) Manages mobile device hardware resources;
(b) Provides common services for mobile device programs;
(c) Controls memory allocation; and
(d) Provides interfaces for applications to access device functionality;
(13) "Office" means the Office of Consumer Protection in the Office of the Attorney
General, established by KRS 367.120;
(14) "Parent" means an adult who has legal authority to make decisions on behalf of
a minor;
(15) "Parent account" means an account with an app store provider that:
(a) Is verified to be established by an individual who the app store provider has
determined is at least eighteen (18) years old through the app store
provider's age verification methods; and
(b) May be affiliated with one (1) or more minor accounts;
(16) "Parental consent disclosure" means information that an app store provider is
required to provide to a parent before obtaining parental consent, and includes:
(a) The age rating of the app or in-app purchase, if one exists;
(b) The content description of the app or in-app purchase, if one exists; and
(c) A description of:
1. The personal data the app collects;
2. The personal data the app shares with a third party; and
3. The app developer's method to protect the personal data the app
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
collects;
(17) "Significant change" means a material modification to an app's terms of service
or privacy policy that:
(a) Changes the categories of data collected, stored, or shared;
(b) Alters the app's age rating or content descriptions;
(c) Adds new monetization features including in-app purchases or
advertisements; or
(d) Materially changes the app's functionality or user experience; and
(18) "Verifiable parental consent" means authorization that:
(a) Is provided by an individual who the app store provider has verified is at
least eighteen (18) years old;
(b) Is given after the app store provider has clearly and conspicuously provided
the parental consent disclosure to the individual; and
(c) Requires the parent to make a choice to grant or decline consent.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An app store provider shall:
(a) At the time an individual who is located in the Commonwealth creates an
account with the app store provider:
1. Request age information from the individual; and
2. Verify the individual's age using:
a. Commercially available methods that are reasonably designed to
ensure accuracy; or
b. An age verification method or process that complies with
administrative regulations promulgated by the office under
Section 10 of this Act;
(b) If the age verification method or process described in paragraph (a)2 of this
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
subsection determines the individual is a minor:
1. Require the account to be affiliated with a parent account; and
2. Obtain verifiable parental consent from the holder of the affiliated
parent account before allowing the minor to:
a. Download any app;
b. Purchase any app; or
c. Make any in-app purchase;
(c) After receiving notice of any significant change from a developer:
1. Notify the user of any significant change; and
2. For a minor account:
a. Notify the holder of the affiliated parent account; and
b. Obtain renewed verifiable parental consent;
(d) Provide to a developer, in connection to a request authorized under Section
3 of this Act:
1. Age category data for a user located in the Commonwealth; and
2. The status of verified parental consent for a minor located in the state;
(e) Notify a developer when a parent revokes parental consent; and
(f) Protect personal age verification data by:
1. Limiting collection and processing to data necessary for:
a. Verifying a user's age;
b. Obtaining parental consent; or
c. Maintaining compliance records; and
2. Transmitting personal age verification data using industry standard
encryption protocols that ensure data integrity and data
confidentiality.
(2) An app store provider shall not:
(a) Enforce a contract or terms of service against a minor unless the app store
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
provider has obtained verifiable parental consent;
(b) Knowingly misrepresent the information in the parental consent disclosure;
or
(c) Share personal age verification data except:
1. Between an app store provider and a developer as required by Sections
7 to 13 of this Act; or
2. As otherwise required by law.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A developer shall:
(a) Verify through the app store's data sharing methods:
1. The age category of users located in this state; and
2. For a minor account, whether verifiable parental consent has been
obtained;
(b) Notify app store providers of a significant change to the app;
(c) Only use age category data received from an app store or other entity to:
1. Enforce age-related restrictions and protections;
2. Ensure compliance with applicable laws and administrative
regulations; or
3. Implement safety-related features or defaults; and
(d) Request personal age verification data or parental consent:
1. At the time a user downloads or purchases an app;
2. When implementing a significant change to the app; or
3. To comply with any applicable law or administrative regulation.
(2) A developer may request personal age verification data or parental consent:
(a) No more than once during each one (1) year period to verify accuracy of
user age data and continued account use within the verified age category;
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
(b) When there is reasonable suspicion of account transfer or misuse outside
the verified age category; or
(c) At the time a user creates a new account with the developer.
(3) A developer shall not:
(a) Enforce a contract or terms of service against a minor unless the developer
has verified through the app store that verifiable parental consent has been
obtained;
(b) Knowingly misrepresent any information in the parental consent disclosure;
or
(c) Share age category data with any person.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Before January 1, 2027, the office shall:
(1) Establish the processes and means by which an app store provider may verify
whether an account holder is a minor in accordance with subsection(1)(a)2.b. of
Section 8 of this Act; and
(2) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
implement this section.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A violation of Section 7 to 13 of this Act shall be deemed an unfair, false,
misleading or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in
violation of KRS 367.170.
(2) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General or any
other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS
367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS 367.170, shall
apply with equal force and effect to a violation of Sections 7 to 13 of this Act.
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the remedies, powers,
duties, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the Commonwealth, or any
other person under any other statutory or common law.
(4) Any parent of a minor injured by a violation of Sections 7 to 13 of this Act, shall
have a civil cause of action in Circuit Court to:
(a) Enjoin further violations;
(b) Recover actual damages sustained or up to one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for each violation, whichever is greater; and
(c) Recover the costs of the action including reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A developer is not liable for a violation under Section 9 of this Act if the
developer demonstrates that the developer:
(a) Relied in good faith on:
1. Personal age verification data provided by an app store provider; and
2. Notification from an app store provider that verifiable parental
consent was obtained if the personal age verification data indicates
that the user is a minor; and
(b) Complied with Section 9 of this Act.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the safe harbor described in this
section:
(a) Applies only to actions brought under Sections 7 to 13 of this Act; and
(b) Does not limit a developer or app store provider's liability under any other
applicable law.
(3) Sections 7 to 13 of this Act shall not displace any other available remedies or
rights authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth or the United States.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 7 to 13 of this Act shall not be construed to:
(1) Prevent an app store provider from taking reasonable measures to:
(a) Block, detect, or prevent distribution of unlawful, obscene, or harmful
material;
(b) Block of filter spam;
(c) Prevent criminal activity; or
(d) Protect app or app store security;
(2) Require an app store provider to disclose user information to a developer beyond
age category or verification of parental consent status;
(3) Allow an app store provider to implement measures required by Section 8 of this
Act in a manner that is arbitrary, capricious, anticompetitive, or unlawful;
(4) Require an app store provider to obtain parental consent for an app that:
(a) Provides direct access to emergency services including 911, crisis hotlines,
or any other emergency assistance services legally available to minors;
(b) Limits data collection to information necessary to provide emergency
services in compliance with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act,
15 U.S.C. sec. 6501 et seq.;
(c) Provides access without requiring account creation or collection of
unnecessary personal information; or
(d) Is operated by or in partnership with an authorized emergency service
provider, governmental entity, or nonprofit organization; or
(5) Require a developer to collect, retain, reidentify, or link any information beyond
what is:
(a) Necessary to verify age categories and parental consent status as required
by this chapter; and
(b) Collected, retained, reidentified, or linked in the developer's ordinary course
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1419
of business.
Section 14. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed